Washington statutes.
RCW 4.36.070

Pleading judgments.

In pleading a judgment or other determination of a court or office of special jurisdiction, it shall not be necessary to state the facts conferring jurisdiction, but such judgment or determination may be stated to have been duly given or made. If such allegation be controverted, the party pleading shall be bound to establish on the trial the facts conferring jurisdiction.

[Code 1881 s 96; 1877 p 21 s 96; 1854 p 142 s 58; RRS s 287.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 9(e).